Georgia, session 2025_26, SB49.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Part 3 of Article 4 of Chapter 11 of Title 16 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated,
relating to carrying and possession of firearms, is amended by adding a new Code section to
read as follows:
"16-11-132.1.
(a) As used in this Code section, the term:
(1) 'Child' means a person younger than 17 years of age.
(2) 'Dealer' shall have the same meaning as provided for under Code Section 16-11-171.
(3) 'Family' means a parent, grandparent, or sibling.
S. B. 49
- 1 -

LC 57 0185
(4) 'Readily dischargeable firearm' means a firearm that is loaded with ammunition,
whether or not a round is in the chamber.
(5) 'Secure' means to take steps that a reasonable person would believe sufficient to
prevent the access to a readily dischargeable firearm by a child, including, but not limited
to, placing a firearm in a locked container or temporarily rendering the firearm inoperable
by a trigger lock or other means.
(b) Except where possession of a firearm by a child is lawful under Code
Section 16-11-132, a person commits the offense of making a firearm accessible to a child
if such child gains access to a readily dischargeable firearm, and the person with criminal
negligence:
(1) Failed to secure the firearm; or
(2) Left the firearm in a place to which the person knew or should have known the child
could gain access.
(c) It shall be an affirmative defense to prosecution under this Code section that the child's
access to the firearm:
(1) Was supervised by a person older than 18 years of age and was for hunting, sporting,
or other lawful purposes;
(2) Consisted of lawful defense by the child of people or property; or
(3) Was gained by entering property in violation of the law.
(d)(1) Except as provided under paragraph (2) of this subsection, a violation of
subsection (b) of this Code section shall be a misdemeanor.
(2) A violation of subsection (b) of this Code section shall be a misdemeanor of a high
and aggravated nature when the child discharges the firearm and causes death or serious
bodily injury to himself or herself or another person.
(3) No person who commits a violation of subsection (b) of this Code section shall be
arrested before the seventh day after the date on which the offense was committed if:
(A) Such person is family of the child who discharged the firearm; and
S. B. 49
- 2 -

LC 57 0185
(B) The child, in discharging the firearm, caused the death of or serious injury to such
child.
(e)(1) A dealer shall post in a conspicuous position on the premises where the dealer
conducts business a sign that contains the following warning in block letters not less than
one inch in height:
'IT IS UNLAWFUL TO STORE, TRANSPORT, OR ABANDON AN UNSECURED
FIREARM IN A PLACE WHERE CHILDREN ARE LIKELY TO BE AND CAN
OBTAIN ACCESS TO THE FIREARM.'
(2) A violation of this subsection shall be a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not
more than $500.00."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 49
- 3 -